Maine, session 132, LD671.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
PART A
Sec. A-1. 36 MRSA c. 843 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 843
INCOME TAX ELIMINATION
§5501. Elimination of income tax
For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, no tax may be collected under this
Part.
Sec. A-2. Department of Administrative and Financial Services review and
report; references to income tax. The Department of Administrative and Financial
Services shall review the provisions of the Maine Revised Statutes that refer to Maine
income tax and submit a report, including suggested legislation, to the Second Regular
Session of the 132nd Legislature identifying any changes necessary to implement this Act.
PART B
Sec. B-1. 5 MRSA §1662, sub-§1-B is enacted to read:
1-B. State budget document. For biennial budget documents for fiscal years 2026-
27 and 2027-28, the budget document must be prepared and submitted using a budget
process that includes zero-based budgeting for each department and agency in the
Executive, Legislative and Judicial Departments of State Government at least once every
8 years. For the purposes of this section, "zero-based budgeting" means a method of
budgeting in which programs and activities are justified for a budgetary period using cost-
benefit analysis without regard to the amount that was budgeted for those programs and
activities in a prior budgetary period.
Sec. B-2. Budget provisions review. By January 1, 2026, the Department of
Administrative and Financial Services shall review the provisions of the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 5, chapter 149 and submit legislation to the Second Regular Session of the
132nd Legislature making necessary changes to statute to facilitate the submission of a
budget for fiscal years 2026-27 and 2027-28 that includes zero-based budgeting based on
the following conditions:
1. Establishing a zero-based budgeting system in which each agency is required to use
a zero-based budgeting format every 8 years;
2. Establishing a system for periodic agency review with the biennial budget;
3. Establishing targeted budgeting or a similar alternative budgeting system for
agencies for budget submissions during years when the agency is not submitting a zero-
based budget; and
4. Requiring the provision of alternative funding and budget recommendations for
agencies that, at a minimum, require recommendations from each agency outlining 5% and
Page 1 - 132LR2037(01)

318 10% funding reduction proposals during years when the agency is not submitting a zero-
329 based budget.